ro-RO: Tip de catarg compatibil: Piesă de recepție pentru muștiuc de corn francez; Muștiuc de melofon (dedicat); Receptor muștiuc de trompetă; Altele
ru: Совместимый тип мундштука: Приемник мундштука валторны; Мундштук меллофона (специальный); Приемник мундштука трубы; Другое
ja: 対応マウスピースタイプ: フレンチホルン用マウスピースレシーバー; メロフォン用マウスピース (専用); トランペット用マウスピースレシーバー; その他
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo kandiklis: Valtornos kandiklio lizdas; Melofono kandiklis (specialus); Trimitų kandiklio lizdas; Kita
fr: Type d'embout compatible: Perce pour bec de cor d’harmonie; Bec de mellophone (dédié); Perce pour bec de trompette; Autre
fi: Yhteensopiva suukappaleen tyyppi: Käyrätorven suukappaleen vastaanotin; Mellofonin suukappale (oma); Trumpetin suukappaleen vastaanotin; Muu
bg-BG: Съвместим тип мундщук: Приемник за мундщук за валдхорна; Мундщук за мелофон (специализиран); Приемник за мундщук за тромпет; Друго
zh-CN: 适用吹口类型: 圆号号嘴接收器; 行进圆号号嘴（专用）; 小号号嘴接收器; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta usnika: Prijamnik usnika za rog; Usnik za melofon (namjenski); Prijamnik usnika za trubu; Ostalo
da: Kompatibel mundstykketype: Mundstykkerør til valdhorn; Mellofon-mundstykke (dedikeret); Mundstykkerør til trompet; Andet
nb: Kompatibel munnstykketype: Munnstykkemottaker for valthorn; Mellofonmunnstykke (dedikert); Munnstykkemottaker for trompet; Annet
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ náustku: Trubica pre nátrubok lesného rohu; Nátrubok pre melofón (špeciálny); Trubica pre nátrubok trúbky; Iné
sv: Kompatibel munstycketyp: Munstyckesfäste för valthorn; Munstycke för mellofon (dedikerat); Munstyckesfäste för trumpet; Övrigt
cs: Typ kompatibilního náustku: Zásuvka nátrubku pro lesní roh; Nátrubek pro melofon (vyhrazený); Zásuvka nátrubku pro trubku; Jiné
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta ustnika: Nastavek za ustnik francoskega roga; Ustnik za melofon (namenski); Nastavek za ustnik trobente; Drugo
zh-TW: 相容吹嘴類型: 法國號吹嘴接管; 行進法國號吹嘴 (專用); 小號吹嘴接管; 其他
tr: Uyumlu ağızlık tipi: Korno ağızlık yuvası; Melofon ağızlığı (özel); Trompet ağızlık yuvası; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de bocal compatível: Encaixe para boquilha de trompa; Boquilha para melofone (dedicada); Encaixe para boquilha de trompete; Outro
ko: 호환 마우스피스 유형: 프렌치 호른 마우스피스 리시버; 멜로폰 마우스피스(전용); 트럼펫 마우스피스 리시버; 기타
th: ประเภทปากเป่าที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ส่วนรับเมาส์พีซเฟรนช์ฮอร์น; เมาส์พีซเมลโลโฟน (เฉพาะ); ส่วนรับเมาส์พีซทรัมเป็ต; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de bocal compatível: Recetor de boquilha de trompa; Boquilha de melofone (dedicado); Recetor de boquilha de trompete; Outro
es: Tipo de boquilla compatible: Receptor de boquilla de corno francés; Boquilla de melófono (exclusiva); Receptor de boquilla de trompeta; Otro
el: Συμβατός τύπος επιστομίου: Υποδοχή επιστόμιου γαλλικού κόρνου; Επιστόμιο μελλόφωνου (ειδικό); Υποδοχή επιστόμιου τρομπέτας; Άλλο
de: Kompatible Mundstückart: Mundstückaufnahme für Waldhorn; Mundstück für Mellophon (spezifisch); Mundstückaufnahme für Trompete; Sonstige
pl: Zgodny typ ustnika: Wlot ustnika do waltorni; Ustnik do melofonu (dedykowany); Wlot ustnika do trąbki; Inne
hu: Kompatibilis fúvókatípus: Kürt fúvókabefogó; Mellofon fúvóka (dedikált); Trombita fúvókabefogó; Egyéb
it: Tipo di bocchino compatibile: Ricevitore per bocchino da corno francese; Bocchino per mellofono (dedicato); Ricevitore per bocchino da tromba; Altro
vi: Loại đầu ngậm tương thích: Ngàm lắp ống ngậm kèn French horn; Ống ngậm kèn Mellophone (chuyên dụng); Ngàm lắp ống ngậm kèn Trumpet; Khác
en: Compatible mouthpiece type: French horn mouthpiece receiver; Mellophone mouthpiece (dedicated); Trumpet mouthpiece receiver; Other
nl: Compatibel type mondstuk: Mondstukhouder voor hoorn; Mellofoonmondstuk (specifiek); Mondstukhouder voor trompet; Overig